Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 5. Foster Care Transition Program.

Sec. 47.18.300.
Program authorized.

The department, in coordination with local public and private agencies, shall design, develop, and implement a foster care transition program to provide support and services to individuals who

reach or have reached the age of 16 or older while in state foster care and have not yet reached 23 years of age; and

meet other eligibility criteria established by the department under (b) of this section.

The department may adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of AS

47.18.300

—

47.18.390

, including regulations establishing eligibility thresholds, standards, and limits for the program. The department shall develop the regulations in consultation with those public and private organizations considered necessary by the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 82 SLA 2002; am § 50 ch 64 SLA 2005)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “23 years of age” for “the age of 21” in paragraph (a)(1).

Sec. 47.18.310.
Program design.

The department, in coordination with local public and private agencies, shall design the program as a continuation of the training efforts related to independent living skills that were initiated when the state foster care recipients were identified as being likely to remain in state foster care until reaching the age of 18. The program design must require that program participants are directly involved in identifying the program activities that will prepare them for independent living.

History.

(§ 2 ch 82 SLA 2002)

Sec. 47.18.320.
Program development.

Subject to the availability of an appropriation made for the purposes of AS

47.18.300

—

47.18.390

, the program may provide

education and vocational training;

assistance in obtaining educational and vocational training;

career and employment services;

training in basic life skills;

housing and utility assistance;

mentoring and counseling; and

other appropriate services to complement the efforts of former state foster care recipients to achieve self-sufficiency.

In developing the program, the department shall cooperate with and coordinate the use of the resources available from other state and federal agencies designed to provide support and services consistent with the purposes of the program.

If appropriations to meet the purposes of this section are insufficient, the department shall submit a written report to the legislature advising the legislature of

the department’s efforts to use existing funds efficiently; and

the opportunities and services the department cannot provide under the existing appropriation level.

When an individual 16 years of age or older who has been in state custody under AS 47.10 for at least six months is released from state custody, the department shall, in addition to any training, services, and assistance provided under (a) — (c) of this section, provide the individual with or assist the individual with obtaining the individual’s

birth certificate; the birth certificate may be an official or certified copy;

social security card;

health insurance information;

medical records;

driver’s license or identification card; and

certificate of degree of Indian or Alaska Native blood, if applicable.

History.

(§ 2 ch 82 SLA 2002; am §§
12, 13 ch 7 4SSLA 2016; am § 20 ch 15 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to applicability of subsection (d), see sec. 22(a), ch. 15, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 24, 2016, in (a)(2), substituted “educational and vocational training” for “basic education and training”; added (c).

The 2018 amendment, effective September 5, 2018, added (d).

Sec. 47.18.330.
Program implementation.

The department may implement the program through the award of contracts or grants to qualified entities to provide services under the program. The department may award contracts and grants if the contracts and grants further the purposes of and meet the requirements of AS

47.18.300

—

47.18.390

and applicable regulations adopted under those sections.

Contracts awarded under this section shall be administered in accordance with AS

47.05.015

and regulations adopted under that section. Grants awarded under this section shall be awarded using requirements established in regulations adopted under AS

47.18.300

—

47.18.390

that are substantially similar to those set out in AS

47.05.015

for contracts.

History.

(§ 2 ch 82 SLA 2002)

Sec. 47.18.390.
Definitions.

In AS

47.18.300

—

47.18.390

,

“program” means the foster care transition program authorized under AS

47.18.300

—

47.18.390

;

“qualified entities” means municipalities, other political subdivisions of the state, nonprofit corporations formed under AS 10.20, churches and religious organizations, and incorporated and unincorporated entities operating within the state that meet the requirements established by the department in regulation;

“state foster care” means foster care, as defined in AS

47.10.990

, that is provided to a person who is in the custody of the department under AS 47.10 and AS 47.12.

History.

(§ 2 ch 82 SLA 2002)